Utah statutes.
53-10-204.   Missing person records -- Confidentiality -- Availability.

Inquiries made regarding missing persons are confidential and are available only to:

(1)  a law enforcement agency investigating a report of a missing person;

(2)  an agency having the responsibility or authority to care for, treat, or supervise a person who is the subject of a placement in temporary or substitute care or an adoption proceeding;

(3)  a court, upon a finding that access to the records may be necessary for the determination of an issue before it;

(4)  the office of the public prosecutor or its deputies;

(5)  any person engaged in bona fide research when approved by the director of the division, excluding names and addresses; and

(6)  entities or persons authorized to receive the information in accordance with Section 53-10-203.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

